Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5242.01
Health carrier or carrier, defined.

Health carrier or carrier shall mean any entity that provides health insurance in this state. Health carrier or carrier shall include an insurance company, a fraternal benefit society, a health maintenance organization, and any other entity providing a plan of health insurance or health benefits subject to state insurance regulation.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 11;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 44-5233;

Laws 1997, LB 862, § 37.